Washington statutes.
RCW 42.45.130

Certificate of notarial act.

(1) A notarial act must be evidenced by a certificate. The certificate must:

(a) Be executed contemporaneously with the performance of the notarial act;

(b) Be signed and dated by the notarial officer and, if the notarial officer is a notary public, be signed in the same manner as on file with the department;

(c) Identify the jurisdiction in which the notarial act is performed;

(d) Contain the title of office of the notarial officer;

(e) Be written in English or in dual languages, one of which must be English;

(f) If the notarial officer is a notary public, indicate the date of expiration, if any, of the officer's commission; and

(g) If the notarial act is performed under RCW 42.45.280, indicate that the notarial act was performed using communication technology.

(2) Regarding notarial act certificates on a tangible record:

(a) If a notarial act regarding a tangible record is performed by a notary public, an official stamp must be affixed to or embossed on the certificate.

(b) If a notarial act regarding a tangible record is performed by a notarial officer other than a notary public and the certificate contains the information specified in subsection (1)(b), (c), and (d) of this section, an official stamp may be affixed to or embossed on the certificate.

(3) Regarding notarial act certificates on an electronic record:

(a) If a notarial act regarding an electronic record is performed by an electronic records notary public, an official stamp must be attached to or logically associated with the certificate.

(b) If a notarial act regarding an electronic record is performed by a notarial officer other than a notary public and the certificate contains the information specified in subsection (1)(b), (c), and (d) of this section, an official stamp may be attached to or logically associated with the certificate.

(4) A certificate of a notarial act is sufficient if it meets the requirements of subsections (1) through (3) of this section and:

(a) Is in a short form set forth in RCW 42.45.140;

(b) Is in a form otherwise permitted by the law of this state;

(c) Is in a form permitted by the law applicable in the jurisdiction in which the notarial act was performed; or

(d) Sets forth the actions of the notarial officer and the actions are sufficient to meet the requirements of the notarial act as provided in RCW 42.45.030, 42.45.040, and 42.45.050 or law of this state other than this chapter.

(5) By executing a certificate of a notarial act, a notarial officer certifies that the officer has complied with the requirements and made the determinations specified in RCW 42.45.030, 42.45.040, and 42.45.050.

(6) A notarial officer may not affix the officer's signature to, or logically associate it with, a certificate until the notarial act has been performed.

(7) If a notarial act is performed regarding a tangible record, a certificate must be part of, or securely attached to, the record. If a notarial act is performed regarding an electronic record, the certificate must be affixed to, or logically associated with, the electronic record. If the director has established standards pursuant to RCW 42.45.250 for attaching, affixing, or logically associating the certificate, the process must conform to the standards.

[ 2019 c 154 s 4; 2017 c 281 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 154: See note following RCW 42.45.280.